Hawaii, session 2025, SB631.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the department of human resources development is responsible for administering the civil service system for the executive branch, including recruitment and hiring of new employees.  The legislature further finds that the department often struggles to respond to applicants in a timely manner, thus decreasing the quality of applicants in the applicant pool.  In some cases, by the time the department responds to potential applicants, the applicant has already accepted another job elsewhere.  The legislature recognizes that centralizing hiring within the department of human resources development is inefficient and contributes to the high vacancy rates and labor shortages in state departments. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to authorize executive branch departments to select applicants from the department of human resources development applicant pool for initial screening. SECTION 2.  Section 76-22.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§76-22.5  Recruitment.  (a) The director shall adopt rules in accordance with sections 76-1 and 78-1 to determine, establish, and maintain the manner in which civil service positions are to be filled.  The director shall seek continuous improvements to streamline the recruitment process so that positions are filled in the most economic, efficient, and expeditious manner possible.  This includes maximizing use of new technologies and developing more efficient alternatives to ensure the availability of qualified applicant pools whether it involves a change in the manner in which initial appointments are to be made, increased delegation to departments, or decentralization to appointing authorities, as necessary and appropriate. (b) Except as otherwise provided by law, the director shall ensure that each department in the executive branch has access to the pool of applicants for vacant civil service positions within that department.  Each department shall be able to select applicants from the pool for initial screening and hiring." SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________